Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 16

Multijurisdictional Cooperation

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

12-16-201. Drug and controlled substance laws — Multijurisdictional enforcement groups.

A county bordering another state may enter into an agreement with the political subdivisions in such other state's contiguous county or parish pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act, §25-20-101 et seq., to form a multijurisdictional enforcement group for the enforcement of drug and controlled substance laws.

Such other state's law enforcement officers may be deputized as officers of the counties of this state participating in an agreement pursuant to this section and shall be deemed to have met all requirements of law enforcement officer training and certification pursuant to §12-9-101 et seq. for the purposes of conducting investigations and making arrests in this state provided such officers have satisfied the applicable law enforcement officer training and certification standards in force in such other state.

The other state's law enforcement officers shall have the same powers and immunities when working under an agreement pursuant to this section as do law enforcement officers of this state.

A multijurisdictional enforcement group formed pursuant to this section is eligible to receive state grants to help defray the costs of its operation.

The provisions of subsections (b)-(d) of this section shall not be in force unless the other state has provided legal authority for its political subdivisions to enter into such agreements and to extend reciprocal powers and privileges to the law enforcement officers of this state working pursuant to such agreements.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1483, § 1.

Subchapter 2

— Drug and Controlled Substance Laws — Multijurisdictional Enforcement Groups for the Enforcement of Drug and Controlled Substance Laws